Utah statutes.
32B-4-206.   Searches, seizures, and fines.

Except when otherwise provided, a fine or forfeiture levied under this title shall be paid to the county treasurer of the county in which the prosecution occurred.



Amended by Chapter 394, 2013 General Session

